Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB168.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 235.240 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A person shall not operate any motorboat or vessel, or manipulate any water skis,
surfboard, or similar device, in a reckless or negligent manner so as to endanger the
life or property of any person.
(2) A person shall not operate any motorboat or vessel, or manipulate any water skis,
surfboard, or similar device, while intoxicated or under the influence of any other
substance which impairs one's driving ability.
(3) (a) Any person who operates a motorboat or vessel upon the waters of the
Commonwealth shall be deemed to have given consent to a test or tests as
accepted by the state's evidentiary mandate for the purpose of determining the
operator's alcohol concentration or the presence of other drugs. The test or
tests shall be administered at the direction of a law enforcement officer who
has probable cause to believe that the operator may have been violating this
section.
(b) If a motorboat or vessel is involved in an accident that results in a fatality or
serious physical injury that creates a substantial risk of death, serious or
prolonged disfigurement, prolonged impairment of health, or prolonged loss
or impairment of the function of any bodily organ, the investigating law
enforcement officer shall seek a search warrant for blood testing of the
operator of the motorboat or vessel unless the testing has already been done
by consent.
(4) For the purposes of enforcing subsection (2) of this section, the elements of the
offense are those established in KRS 189A.010(1) to (4), and the penalties and
aggravating circumstances for the offense are the same as those established in
KRS 189A.010(5) to (11)[except that the penalties for this offense are set forth in
Page 1 of 4
XXXX 12/18/2025 2:28 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 126
KRS 235.990].
(5) In addition to all other penalties, a person found guilty of violating subsection (2)
of this section shall take a safe-boating course offered by the department and
shall present to the court a certificate documenting successful completion of the
course. The person attending a class under this subsection shall pay the
department a fee of one hundred dollars ($100) for the costs of materials and
instruction before receiving a certificate of completion.
Section 2. KRS 235.990 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Any person who violates any of the provisions of this chapter or administrative
regulations adopted under this chapter shall be fined not less than fifty dollars ($50)
nor more than two hundred dollars ($200). After July 15, 2000, any person who
violates KRS 235.230 shall be fined not less than fifteen dollars ($15) nor more
than one hundred dollars ($100) and each day the violation continues may
constitute a separate offense.
(2)[ Any person who violates KRS 235.240 shall not be subject to the penalties of KRS
Chapter 189A but shall be guilty of a separate offense and subject to a fine of two
hundred dollars ($200) to two hundred fifty dollars ($250) or imprisonment for
twenty-four (24) hours for the first offense, a fine of three hundred fifty dollars
($350) to five hundred dollars ($500) or imprisonment for forty-eight (48) hours for
the second offense, and a fine of six hundred dollars ($600) to one thousand dollars
($1,000) or imprisonment in the county jail for not less than thirty (30) days, or
both, for the third or subsequent offense. Refusal to submit to a breath alcohol
analysis or similar test in violation of KRS 235.240(3) shall be deemed an offense.
(3) (a)] A person may, in addition or in lieu of the penalties specified in subsection (1)
or (4)[(5)] of this section, be required to take a safe-boating course approved by the
department or offered by the United States Coast Guard, Coast Guard Auxiliary, or
U.S. Power Squadron and to present the court a certificate documenting successful
Page 2 of 4
XXXX 12/18/2025 2:28 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 126
completion of the course.
[(b) A person shall, in addition to the penalties of subsection (2) of this section, be
required to take a safe-boating course offered by the department and to
present the court a certificate documenting successful completion of the
course. The person attending a class under this paragraph shall pay the
department a fee of one hundred dollars ($100) for the costs of materials and
instruction before receiving a certificate of completion.]
(3) [(4) After July 15, 2000, ]Any person who violates KRS 235.420 or 235.430 shall
be fined:
(a) For the first offense, not less than fifteen dollars ($15) nor more than one
hundred dollars ($100);
(b) For the second offense,[. A person who violates KRS 235.420 or 235.430
shall be fined] not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than three
hundred dollars ($300); and
(c) For the third or subsequent offense,[ for the second offense, and] not less
than three hundred dollars ($300) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500)[
for the third or any subsequent offense].
(4)[(5)] Any person failing to obey a citation issued in accordance with KRS 235.315
shall be guilty of a separate offense and shall be fined not less than fifty dollars
($50) nor more than two hundred dollars ($200).
(5)[(6)] Any person who makes a false statement regarding a marine boat toilet on the
application for registration or renewal registration for a motorboat shall be fined
one hundred dollars ($100). This penalty shall be separate from any other penalty
that may be applicable for violation of this chapter.
(6)[(7)] Any person who resists, obstructs, interferes with, threatens, attempts to
intimidate, or in any other manner interferes with any officer in the discharge of his
duties, other than a criminal homicide or an assault against an officer enforcing the
Page 3 of 4
XXXX 12/18/2025 2:28 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 126
provisions of this chapter, KRS Chapter 150, or the administrative regulations
issued under either of these chapters, shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.
(7)[(8)] Any person who commits a criminal homicide or an assault against an officer
enforcing the provisions of this chapter, KRS Chapter 150, or the administrative
regulations issued under either of these chapters shall be subject to the penalties
specified for the offense under KRS Chapter 507 or 508, as appropriate.
(8)[(9)] Any person who violates KRS 235.203 shall be fined fifty dollars ($50).
SECTION 3. A NEW SECTION OF KRS 15.530 TO 15.590 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
In addition to all other required dispatches and reports, a public safety
telecommunicator who receives a report of an accident involving a motorboat or vessel
on any waters within the jurisdiction of the Commonwealth shall immediately report
the accident, or cause a report of the accident to be made, to the post of the Department
of Kentucky State Police covering where the accident occurred.
Section 4. This Act may be cited as Keegan's Law.
Page 4 of 4
XXXX 12/18/2025 2:28 PM Jacketed